North Carolina statutes. Constitution of North Carolina
Article XIV Miscellaneous

§ 1. Seat of government.

The permanent seat of government of this State shall be at the City of Raleigh.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. XIV, § 6, Const. 1868, as amended in 1962.

§ 2. State boundaries.

The limits and boundaries of the State shall be and remain as they now are.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 34, Const. 1868.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Ambulatory Seaward Boundary Consistent with Constitution. —

While a proposal to permanently fix the seaward boundary for the State at specific coordinates would violate both

G.S. 141-6(a)

, and this section, the acceptance of an ambulatory boundary, which merely represents the seaward boundary’s location at a certain time, and moves with changes to the shoreline, whether by erosion, accretion or fill deposition, would be consistent with the Constitution and not require amendment of the statute; a reading of the State constitutional provision together with the statute and the case law reveal them to require that the eastern boundary always remain at distance of three geographical miles from the extreme low water mark.
See opinion of Attorney General to Gary W. Thompson, Chief, North Carolina Geodetic Survey, 1998 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 7 (2/11/98).

§ 3. General laws defined.

Whenever the General Assembly is directed or authorized by this Constitution to enact general laws, or general laws uniformly applicable throughout the State, or general laws uniformly applicable in every county, city and town, and other unit of local government, or in every local court district, no special or local act shall be enacted concerning the subject matter directed or authorized to be accomplished by general or uniformly applicable laws, and every amendment or repeal of any law relating to such subject matter shall also be general and uniform in its effect throughout the State. General laws may be enacted for classes defined by population or other criteria. General laws uniformly applicable throughout the State shall be made applicable without classification or exception in every unit of local government of like kind, such as every county, or every city and town, but need not be made applicable in every unit of local government in the State. General laws uniformly applicable in every county, city and town, and other unit of local government, or in every local court district, shall be made applicable without classification or exception in every unit of local government, or in every local court district, as the case may be. The General Assembly may at any time repeal any special, local, or private act.

History.

1969, c. 1200, s. 1; c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. IV, § 20, Const. 1868, as that article was rewritten in 1962.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Town of Emerald Isle v. State of North Carolina: A New Test for Distinguishing Between General Laws and Local Legislation,” see 66 N.C.L. Rev. 1096 (1988).

§ 4. Continuity of laws; protection of officeholders.

The laws of North Carolina not in conflict with this Constitution shall continue in force until lawfully altered. Except as otherwise specifically provided, the adoption of this Constitution shall not have the effect of vacating any office or term of office now filled or held by virtue of any election or appointment made under the prior Constitution of North Carolina and the laws of the State enacted pursuant thereto.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

This section is new with the Constitution of 1970.

§ 5. Conservation of natural resources.

It shall be the policy of this State to conserve and protect its lands and waters for the benefit of all its citizenry, and to this end it shall be a proper function of the State of North Carolina and its political subdivisions to acquire and preserve park, recreational, and scenic areas, to control and limit the pollution of our air and water, to control excessive noise, and in every other appropriate way to preserve as a part of the common heritage of this State its forests, wetlands, estuaries, beaches, historical sites, openlands, and places of beauty.

To accomplish the aforementioned public purposes, the State and its counties, cities and towns, and other units of local government may acquire by purchase or gift properties or interests in properties which shall, upon their special dedication to and acceptance by a law enacted by a vote of three-fifths of the members of each house of the General Assembly for those public purposes, constitute part of the “State Nature and Historic Preserve,” and which shall not be used for other purposes except as authorized by law enacted by a vote of three-fifths of the members of each house of the General Assembly. The General Assembly shall prescribe by general law the conditions and procedures under which such properties or interests therein shall be dedicated for the aforementioned public purposes.

History.

1971, c. 630, s. 1; 1999-268, s. 3; 2001-217, s. 3; 2002-3 (Extra Session), s. 1.

Cross references.

As to the Coastal Reserve Program, see

G.S. 113A-129.2

.

§ 6. (See Editor’s note) Marriage.

Marriage between one man and one woman is the only domestic legal union that shall be valid or recognized in this State. This section does not prohibit a private party from entering into contracts with another private party; nor does this section prohibit courts from adjudicating the rights of private parties pursuant to such contracts.

History.

2011-409, s. 1.